Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0672, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Credit. A taxpayer is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this chapter for long-term care insurance policy premiums paid during the tax year. The credit for each policy equals deleted text begin 25 percentdeleted text end new text begin the amountnew text end of premiums paid to the extent not deducted in determining taxable net income. A taxpayer may claim a credit for only one policy for each qualified beneficiary. A maximum of deleted text begin $100deleted text end new text begin $250new text end applies to each qualified beneficiary. The maximum total credit allowed per year is deleted text begin $200deleted text end new text begin $500new text end for married couples filing joint returns and deleted text begin $100deleted text end new text begin $250new text end for all other filers. For a nonresident or part-year resident, the credit determined under this section must be allocated based on the percentage calculated under section 290.06, subdivision 2c, paragraph (e). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end